Illinois, session 104th, SB1475.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended by 5changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 205/5)  (from Ch. 144, par. 185)7    Sec. 5. The members of the Board shall serve without 8compensation but they shall be reimbursed for their actual and 9necessary traveling and other expenses while engaged in the 10performance of their duties. A student member shall receive a 11scholarship award of $500 for each semester in which the 12student member is enrolled at an institution of higher 13education and serving as a student member of the Board. The 14scholarship shall be payable to the institution of higher 15education at which the student member is enrolled and may be 16used for tuition and fees, books, and supplies. 17(Source: Laws 1961, p. 3819.) 18    Section 10. The Public Community College Act is amended by 19changing Section 2-5 as follows: 20    (110 ILCS 805/2-5)  (from Ch. 122, par. 102-5)21    Sec. 2-5. Compensation and expenses of members. The   SB1475 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10338 LNS 20412 b1members of the State Board shall serve without compensation 2but they shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary 3expenses while engaged in the performance of their duties. The 4student member shall receive a scholarship award of $500 for 5each semester in which the student member is enrolled at a 6community college and serving as the student member of the 7State Board. The scholarship shall be payable to the community 8college at which the student member is enrolled and may be used 9for tuition and fees, books, and supplies. 10(Source: P.A. 96-910, eff. 7-1-10.)